src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4931 N 1
SFX 4931 mnōńć ōnłybyście .
SFX 4932 N 1
SFX 4932 mnōńć ōnłyby .
SFX 4933 N 1
SFX 4933 mnōńć ōnłychmy .
SFX 4934 N 1
SFX 4934 mnōńć ōnłymy .
SFX 4935 N 1
SFX 4935 mnōńć ōnłyście .
SFX 4936 N 1
SFX 4936 mnōńć ōnły .
SFX 4937 N 1
SFX 4937 mnōńć ōn .
SFX 4938 N 1
SFX 4938 mnōńć ynci .
SFX 4939 N 1
SFX 4939 mnōńć yntego .
SFX 4940 N 1
SFX 4940 mnōńć ynte .
SFX 4941 N 1
SFX 4941 mnōńć ynto .
SFX 4942 N 1
SFX 4942 mnōńć yntōm .
SFX 4943 N 1
SFX 4943 mnōńć yntych .
SFX 4944 N 1
SFX 4944 mnōńć yntyj .
SFX 4945 N 1
SFX 4945 mnōńć yntymi .
SFX 4946 N 1
SFX 4946 mnōńć yntymu .
SFX 4947 N 1
SFX 4947 mnōńć yntym .
SFX 4948 N 1
SFX 4948 mnōńć ynty .
SFX 4949 N 1
SFX 4949 mnōńć yńciach .
SFX 4950 N 1
SFX 4950 mnōńć yńciami .
SFX 4951 N 1
SFX 4951 mnōńć yńcia .
SFX 4952 N 1
SFX 4952 mnōńć yńcie .
SFX 4953 N 1
SFX 4953 mnōńć yńcio .
SFX 4954 N 1
SFX 4954 mnōńć yńciōm .
SFX 4955 N 1
SFX 4955 mnōńć yńciu .
SFX 4956 N 1
SFX 4956 mnōńć yńciym .
SFX 4957 N 1
SFX 4957 mnōńć yńć .
SFX 4958 Y 1
SFX 4958 jymny iyjsi .
PFX 4958 Y 1
PFX 4958 prz god .
SFX 4959 Y 1
SFX 4959 ijymny iyjszego .
PFX 4959 Y 1
PFX 4959 pr god .
SFX 4960 Y 1
SFX 4960 ijymny iyjsze .
PFX 4960 Y 1
PFX 4960 pr god .
SFX 4961 Y 1
SFX 4961 ijymny iyjszo .
PFX 4961 Y 1
PFX 4961 pr god .
SFX 4962 Y 1
SFX 4962 ijymny iyjszōm .
PFX 4962 Y 1
PFX 4962 pr god .
SFX 4963 Y 1
SFX 4963 ijymny iyjszych .
PFX 4963 Y 1
PFX 4963 pr god .
SFX 4964 Y 1
SFX 4964 ijymny iyjszyj .
PFX 4964 Y 1
PFX 4964 pr god .
SFX 4965 Y 1
SFX 4965 ny i .
PFX 4965 Y 1
PFX 4965 przij godniyjsz .
SFX 4966 Y 1
SFX 4966 ny u .
PFX 4966 Y 1
PFX 4966 przij godniyjsz .
SFX 4967 Y 1
SFX 4967 ny 0 .
PFX 4967 Y 1
PFX 4967 przij godniyjsz .
SFX 4968 Y 1
SFX 4968 ijymny iyjszy .
PFX 4968 Y 1
PFX 4968 pr god .
SFX 4969 N 1
SFX 4969 anōńć ōniach .
SFX 4970 N 1
SFX 4970 anōńć ōniami .
SFX 4971 N 1
SFX 4971 anōńć ōnia .
SFX 4972 N 1
SFX 4972 anōńć ōnie .
SFX 4973 N 1
SFX 4973 anōńć ōnio .
SFX 4974 N 1
SFX 4974 anōńć ōniōm .
SFX 4975 N 1
SFX 4975 anōńć ōniu .
SFX 4976 N 1
SFX 4976 anōńć ōniym .
SFX 4977 N 1
SFX 4977 anōńć ōńcie .
SFX 4978 N 1
SFX 4978 anōńć ōńmy .
SFX 4979 N 1
SFX 4979 anōńć ōń .
SFX 4980 N 1
SFX 4980 oć aja .
SFX 4981 N 1
SFX 4981 oć ajecie .
SFX 4982 N 1
SFX 4982 oć ajesz .
SFX 4983 N 1
SFX 4983 oć aje .
SFX 4984 N 1
SFX 4984 oć ajōm .
SFX 4985 N 1
SFX 4985 oć ajōncego .
SFX 4986 N 1
SFX 4986 oć ajōnce .
SFX 4987 N 1
SFX 4987 oć ajōnco .
SFX 4988 N 1
SFX 4988 oć ajōncōm .
SFX 4989 N 1
SFX 4989 oć ajōnc .
SFX 4990 N 1
SFX 4990 oć ajōncych .
SFX 4991 N 1
SFX 4991 oć ajōncyj .
SFX 4992 N 1
SFX 4992 oć ajōncymi .
SFX 4993 N 1
SFX 4993 oć ajōncymu .
SFX 4994 N 1
SFX 4994 oć ajōncym .
SFX 4995 N 1
SFX 4995 oć ajōncy .
SFX 4996 N 1
SFX 4996 oć ajymy .
SFX 4997 N 1
SFX 4997 ota ōt .
SFX 4998 Y 1
SFX 4998 zy i .
PFX 4998 Y 1
PFX 4998 0 noj .
SFX 4999 Y 1
SFX 4999 y ego .
PFX 4999 Y 1
PFX 4999 0 noj .
SFX 5000 Y 1
SFX 5000 y e .
PFX 5000 Y 1
PFX 5000 0 noj .
SFX 5001 Y 1
SFX 5001 y o .
PFX 5001 Y 1
PFX 5001 0 noj .
SFX 5002 Y 1
SFX 5002 y ōm .
PFX 5002 Y 1
PFX 5002 0 noj .
SFX 5003 Y 1
SFX 5003 0 ch .
PFX 5003 Y 1
PFX 5003 0 noj .
SFX 5004 Y 1
SFX 5004 0 mi .
PFX 5004 Y 1
PFX 5004 0 noj .
SFX 5005 Y 1
SFX 5005 0 mu .
PFX 5005 Y 1
PFX 5005 0 noj .
SFX 5006 Y 1
SFX 5006 0 m .
PFX 5006 Y 1
PFX 5006 0 noj .
SFX 5007 N 1
SFX 5007 o zie .
SFX 5008 N 1
SFX 5008 ōść osnōncego .
SFX 5009 N 1
SFX 5009 ōść osnōnce .
SFX 5010 N 1
SFX 5010 ōść osnōnco .
SFX 5011 N 1
SFX 5011 ōść osnōncōm .
SFX 5012 N 1
SFX 5012 ōść osnōnc .
SFX 5013 N 1
SFX 5013 ōść osnōncych .
SFX 5014 N 1
SFX 5014 ōść osnōncyj .
SFX 5015 N 1
SFX 5015 ōść osnōncymi .
SFX 5016 N 1
SFX 5016 ōść osnōncymu .
SFX 5017 N 1
SFX 5017 ōść osnōncym .
SFX 5018 N 1
SFX 5018 ōść osnōncy .
SFX 5019 N 1
SFX 5019 ōś osnōncego .
SFX 5020 N 1
SFX 5020 ōś osnōnce .
SFX 5021 N 1
SFX 5021 ōś osnōnco .
SFX 5022 N 1
SFX 5022 ōś osnōncōm .
SFX 5023 N 1
SFX 5023 ōś osnōnc .
SFX 5024 N 1
SFX 5024 ōś osnōncych .
SFX 5025 N 1
SFX 5025 ōś osnōncyj .
SFX 5026 N 1
SFX 5026 ōś osnōncymi .
SFX 5027 N 1
SFX 5027 ōś osnōncymu .
SFX 5028 N 1
SFX 5028 ōś osnōncym .
SFX 5029 N 1
SFX 5029 ōś osnōncy .
SFX 5030 N 1
SFX 5030 owy ōw .
SFX 5031 Y 1
SFX 5031 a 0 .
PFX 5031 Y 1
PFX 5031 ry rō .
SFX 5032 Y 1
SFX 5032 ko zij .
PFX 5032 Y 1
PFX 5032 0 noj .
SFX 5033 N 1
SFX 5033 ko zij .
SFX 5034 N 1
SFX 5034 ie e .
SFX 5035 N 1
SFX 5035 0 bie .
SFX 5036 N 1
SFX 5036 ie obie .
SFX 5037 N 1
SFX 5037 ie obōm .
SFX 5038 N 1
SFX 5038 ymset miōmaset .
SFX 5039 N 1
SFX 5039 ymset miuset .
SFX 5040 N 1
SFX 5040 ym miōma .
SFX 5041 N 1
SFX 5041 ym miu .
SFX 5042 Y 1
SFX 5042 0 jōnce .
PFX 5042 Y 1
PFX 5042 s dz .
SFX 5043 Y 1
SFX 5043 0 jōncych .
PFX 5043 Y 1
PFX 5043 s dz .
SFX 5044 Y 1
SFX 5044 0 jōncymi .
PFX 5044 Y 1
PFX 5044 s dz .
SFX 5045 Y 1
SFX 5045 0 jōncym .
PFX 5045 Y 1
PFX 5045 s dz .
SFX 5046 Y 1
SFX 5046 e ōne .
PFX 5046 Y 1
PFX 5046 s dz .
SFX 5047 Y 1
SFX 5047 e ōnych .
PFX 5047 Y 1
PFX 5047 s dz .
SFX 5048 Y 1
SFX 5048 e ōnymi .
PFX 5048 Y 1
PFX 5048 s dz .
SFX 5049 Y 1
SFX 5049 e ōnym .
PFX 5049 Y 1
PFX 5049 s dz .
SFX 5050 Y 1
SFX 5050 e gniynte .
PFX 5050 Y 1
PFX 5050 s l .
SFX 5051 Y 1
SFX 5051 e gniyntych .
PFX 5051 Y 1
PFX 5051 s l .
SFX 5052 Y 1
SFX 5052 e gniyntymi .
PFX 5052 Y 1
PFX 5052 s l .
SFX 5053 Y 1
SFX 5053 e gniyntym .
PFX 5053 Y 1
PFX 5053 s l .
PFX 5054 N 1
PFX 5054 si podarzōn .
SFX 5055 Y 1
SFX 5055 e 0 .
PFX 5055 Y 1
PFX 5055 s podarzōnym .
PFX 5056 N 1
PFX 5056 s sob .
SFX 5057 N 1
SFX 5057 ie tracōne .
SFX 5058 N 1
SFX 5058 ie tracōnych .
SFX 5059 N 1
SFX 5059 ie tracōnymi .
SFX 5060 N 1
SFX 5060 ie tracōnym .
PFX 5061 N 1
PFX 5061 si wrōcōn .
SFX 5062 Y 1
SFX 5062 e 0 .
PFX 5062 Y 1
PFX 5062 s wrōcōnym .
SFX 5063 Y 1
SFX 5063 a 0 .
PFX 5063 Y 1
PFX 5063 sio siō .
SFX 5064 N 1
SFX 5064 ała oł .
SFX 5065 N 1
SFX 5065 sły śli .
SFX 5066 N 1
SFX 5066 orb arbach .
SFX 5067 N 1
SFX 5067 orb arbami .
SFX 5068 N 1
SFX 5068 orb arbie .
SFX 5069 N 1
SFX 5069 orb arbowi .
SFX 5070 N 1
SFX 5070 orb arbōm .
SFX 5071 N 1
SFX 5071 orb arbōw .
SFX 5072 N 1
SFX 5072 orb arbu .
SFX 5073 N 1
SFX 5073 orb arb .
SFX 5074 N 1
SFX 5074 orb arbym .
SFX 5075 N 1
SFX 5075 orb arby .
SFX 5076 Y 1
SFX 5076 ć 0 .
PFX 5076 Y 1
PFX 5076 sł śl .
SFX 5077 Y 1
SFX 5077 łać z .
PFX 5077 Y 1
PFX 5077 0 śle .
SFX 5078 N 1
SFX 5078 owo ōw .
SFX 5079 N 1
SFX 5079 e om .
SFX 5080 N 1
SFX 5080 e owi .
SFX 5081 N 1
SFX 5081 e y .
SFX 5082 N 1
SFX 5082 e ze .
SFX 5083 N 1
SFX 5083 na yn .
SFX 5084 N 1
SFX 5084 sna śnie .
SFX 5085 N 1
SFX 5085 ōl olach .
SFX 5086 N 1
SFX 5086 ōl olami .
SFX 5087 N 1
SFX 5087 ōl ole .
SFX 5088 N 1
SFX 5088 ōl oli .
SFX 5089 N 1
SFX 5089 ōl olōm .
SFX 5090 N 1
SFX 5090 ōm ama .
SFX 5091 N 1
SFX 5091 ōm amego .
SFX 5092 N 1
SFX 5092 ōm ame .
SFX 5093 N 1
SFX 5093 ōm ami .
SFX 5094 N 1
SFX 5094 ōm amo .
PFX 5095 N 1
PFX 5095 s sam .
SFX 5096 N 1
SFX 5096 ōm amych .
SFX 5097 N 1
SFX 5097 ōm amyj .
SFX 5098 N 1
SFX 5098 ōm amymi .
SFX 5099 N 1
SFX 5099 ōm amymu .
SFX 5100 N 1
SFX 5100 ōm amym .
SFX 5101 Y 1
SFX 5101 ać ia .
PFX 5101 Y 1
PFX 5101 s ś .
SFX 5102 Y 1
SFX 5102 ać icie .
PFX 5102 Y 1
PFX 5102 s ś .
SFX 5103 Y 1
SFX 5103 ać ijcie .
PFX 5103 Y 1
PFX 5103 s ś .
SFX 5104 Y 1
SFX 5104 ać ijmy .
PFX 5104 Y 1
PFX 5104 s ś .
SFX 5105 Y 1
SFX 5105 ać ij .
PFX 5105 Y 1
PFX 5105 s ś .
SFX 5106 Y 1
SFX 5106 ać iōm .
PFX 5106 Y 1
PFX 5106 s ś .
SFX 5107 Y 1
SFX 5107 ać iōncego .
PFX 5107 Y 1
PFX 5107 s ś .
SFX 5108 Y 1
SFX 5108 ać iōnce .
PFX 5108 Y 1
PFX 5108 s ś .
SFX 5109 Y 1
SFX 5109 ać iōnco .
PFX 5109 Y 1
PFX 5109 s ś .
SFX 5110 Y 1
SFX 5110 ać iōncōm .
PFX 5110 Y 1
PFX 5110 s ś .
SFX 5111 Y 1
SFX 5111 ać iōnc .
PFX 5111 Y 1
PFX 5111 s ś .
SFX 5112 Y 1
SFX 5112 ać iōncych .
PFX 5112 Y 1
PFX 5112 s ś .
SFX 5113 Y 1
SFX 5113 ać iōncyj .
PFX 5113 Y 1
PFX 5113 s ś .
SFX 5114 Y 1
SFX 5114 ać iōncymi .
PFX 5114 Y 1
PFX 5114 s ś .
SFX 5115 Y 1
SFX 5115 ać iōncymu .
PFX 5115 Y 1
PFX 5115 s ś .
SFX 5116 Y 1
SFX 5116 ać iōncym .
PFX 5116 Y 1
PFX 5116 s ś .
SFX 5117 Y 1
SFX 5117 ać iōncy .
