src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
Rydułtowy/349,350,119,5030
przijmnōńć/176,177,178,179,180,181,182,210,211,4910,4911,4912,4913,4914,4915,4916,4917,4918,4919,4920,4921,4922,4923,4924,4925,4926,4927,4928,4929,4930,4931,4932,4933,4934,4935,4936,4937,4938,4939,4940,4941,4942,4943,4944,4945,4946,4947,4948,4949,4950,4951,4952,4953,4954,4955,4956,4957
przijymny/4958,4959,4960,4961,4962,4963,4964,4965,4966,4967,4968,233,234,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,242,243,115,116,117,222,223,224,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,232,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
przistanōńć/176,177,178,179,183,184,185,186,187,188,189,190,191,192,193,203,204,205,206,207,208,209,210,1136,1137,1138,1139,1140,1141,1142,1143,1144,1145,1146,1147,1148,1149,1150,1151,1152,1153,1154,1155,1156,1157,211,4969,4970,4971,4972,4973,4974,4975,4976,4977,4978,4979
robota/126,83,86,103,104,105,106,4997
rynka/5031,133,83,86,122,103,104
rzodko/5032,5033
rōndo/92,93,99,96,100,361,101,5007
rōś/2411,2412,2413,2414,2415,2416,2417,2418,2419,2420,2421,2422,5019,5020,5021,5022,5023,5024,5025,5026,5027,5028,5029,2423,2424,2425,2426,2427,2428,2429,2430,2431,2432,2433,2434,2435,2436,2437,2438,2439,2440,1411
rōść/2369,2370,2371,2372,2373,2374,2375,2376,2377,2378,2379,2380,2381,2382,2383,2384,2385,2386,2387,2388,2389,2390,2391,2392,5008,5009,5010,5011,5012,5013,5014,5015,5016,5017,5018,2393,2394,2395,2396,2397,2398,2399,2400,2401,2402,2403,2404,2405,2406,2407,2408,2409,2410,1460,1461,1462,1501
siasie/5034,5035,5036,5037
sie/5042,5043,5044,5045,5046,5047,5048,5049,5050,5051,5052,5053,5054,5055,5034,5035,5056,5037,5057,5058,5059,5060,5061,5062
siedym/5040,5041
siedymset/5038,5039
siostra/83,86,103,104,106,120,5063
skała/109,83,86,103,104,106,5064
skisły/115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,5065
skorb/5066,5067,5068,5069,5070,5071,5072,5073,5074,5075
software/430,431,5079,5080,2444,435,436,5081,5082
sosna/83,86,103,104,106,5083,5084
spać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,5101,5102,5103,5104,5105,5106,5107,5108,5109,5110,5111,5112,5113,5114,5115,5116,5117,5118,5119,5120
stado/92,93,99,96,100,361,101,5007
stanōńć/176,177,178,179,183,184,185,186,187,188,189,190,191,192,193,203,204,205,206,207,208,209,210,1136,1137,1138,1139,1140,1141,1142,1143,1144,1145,1146,1147,1148,1149,1150,1151,1152,1153,1154,1155,1156,1157,211,4969,4970,4971,4972,4973,4974,4975,4976,4977,4978,4979
słać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,5076,5077
słodko/5032,5033
słowo/92,93,99,440,96,100,101,5078
sōl/5085,5086,5087,5088,5089
sōm/5090,5091,5092,5093,5094,5095,5096,5097,5098,5099,5100
topōl/5085,5086,5223,5087,5224,5089,5225,5226,5227
udo/92,93,99,96,100,361,101,5007
wiosna/83,86,103,104,106,5083,5084
wyglyndo/92,93,99,96,100,361,101,5007
wzniōsły/5625,5626,5627,5628,5629,5630,5631,5632,5633,5634,5635,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,5065,5636,5637,5638,5639,5640,5641,5642,5643,5644,5645,5646
zajmnōńć/176,177,178,179,180,181,182,210,211,4910,4911,4912,4913,4914,4915,4916,4917,4918,4919,4920,4921,4922,4923,4924,4925,4926,4927,4928,4929,4930,4931,4932,4933,4934,4935,4936,4937,4938,4939,4940,4941,4942,4943,4944,4945,4946,4947,4948,4949,4950,4951,4952,4953,4954,4955,4956,4957
